Oklahoma, session 2025, SB251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 4, Chapter 201, O.S.L.
2023 (43A O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 2-312.4), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 2-312.4. A. Subject to availability of funds under
Section 631 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes Section 2-312.1 of
this title, the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services shall annually issue a request for proposals by which
county governments or multi-county partnerships may apply for funds
for the development and implementation of evidence-based:
1. Mental health and substance abuse treatment programs or
other health care programs provided in the community;

2. Pretrial diversion programs, mental health and substance use
jail intake screenings, or jail reentry programs;
3. Employment programs;
4. Education programs; or
5. Housing programs.
B. The request for proposals shall include, but not be limited
to, the proposed services, number of individuals to be served by the
proposed services or programs, and the manner in which the services
or programs will partner with or be supported by local Department-
contracted or -certified entities.
C. For a proposal to be considered, the applying county
government or multi-county partnership must submit all necessary
documents to meet the requirements outlined in the request for
proposals.
D. The number of awards and funding amounts of each award shall
be at the discretion of the Department and shall be based on total
available funds, total county population, and the criteria in
subsection B of this section. Each county government or multi-
county partnership shall be allocated at least half of one percent
(0.5%) of the total amount appropriated for the award cycle.
E. The Department shall submit an annual report to the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives that includes the amount awarded to each county
government or multi-county partnership and a summary of services
provided by each county government or multi-county partnership.
F. The Board of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services
shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this act this
section and Sections 2-312.1, 2-312.2, and 2-312.3 of this title
including, but not limited to, rules that set qualifications for
programs eligible to receive funds under this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 251 Page 2

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 251 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 17th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 251 Page 4